Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-635
Railroad company; obligations; sections; effect.

Nothing in sections 18-617 to 18-636 shall modify, change, or abrogate any obligation of any railroad company or companies to maintain, reconstruct, or keep in repair any viaduct or subway previously built or any replacement of such viaduct or subway under any agreement, statute, or ordinance previously in effect.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 17, p. 109;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 65.

This section is not a special saving clause but is a proviso. State ex rel. City of Grand Island v. Union Pacific R. R. Co., 152 Neb. 772, 42 N.W.2d 867 (1950).